New York, session 2025-2026, A9105.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 4 of section 301 of the agriculture and markets 2 law is amended by adding two new paragraphs p and q to read as follows: 3 p. Land that is owned or rented as a farm operation for the preceding 4 two years for the production for sale of crops, livestock or livestock 5 products, that consists of (1) not less than seven acres and an annual 6 gross sales value of five thousand dollars or more; or (2) less than 7 seven acres and an annual gross sales value of thirty-five thousand 8 dollars or more. Such farm operation shall also be able to establish 9 that the farm operation will meet the gross sales value requirements 10 described in paragraph f of this subdivision within three years of 11 attaining an agricultural assessment. The commissioner or the advisory 12 board established pursuant to section three hundred nine-a of this arti- 13 cle shall create a set of metrics and considerations used by assessors 14 to determine whether the farm operation will meet such gross sales value 15 requirement within three years. Assessors shall use such metrics and 16 considerations and shall give special consideration to farm operations 17 that were awarded any state or federal grants, in particular grants for 18 beginning farmers and grants for economically and socially disadvantaged 19 farmers. The commissioner or the advisory board established pursuant to 20 section three hundred nine-a of this article shall monitor the farm 21 operation's progress, and the commissioner may provide technical assist- 22 ance, including connecting the farm operation to resources for the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01742-03-6 A. 9105--A 2 1 purposes of assisting the farm operation in meeting the gross sales 2 value requirement within the time allotted. Land that receives an agri- 3 cultural assessment and is unable to meet the required gross sales value 4 within three years as described in this paragraph shall no longer be 5 considered land used in agricultural production pursuant to this 6 subdivision. 7 q. Land of not less than seven acres that is owned or rented by a 8 newly established farm operation for the production for sale of crops, 9 livestock or livestock products in its first or second year of agricul- 10 tural production, which does not independently satisfy the gross sales 11 value requirement, but is able to establish that the farming operation 12 will meet the gross sales value requirements described in paragraph f of 13 this subdivision within five years of attaining an agricultural assess- 14 ment. The commissioner or the advisory board established pursuant to 15 section three hundred nine-a of this article shall create a set of 16 metrics and considerations used by assessors to determine whether the 17 farm operation will meet such gross sales value requirement within five 18 years. Assessors shall use such metrics and considerations and shall 19 give special consideration to farm operations that were awarded any 20 state or federal grants, in particular grants for beginning farmers and 21 grants for economically and socially disadvantaged farmers. The commis- 22 sioner or the advisory board established pursuant to section three 23 hundred nine-a of this article shall monitor the farm operation's 24 progress, and the commissioner may provide technical assistance, includ- 25 ing connecting the farm operation to resources for the purpose of 26 assisting the farm operation in meeting the gross sales value require- 27 ment within the time allotted. Land that receives an agricultural 28 assessment and is unable to meet the required gross sales value in five 29 years as described in this paragraph shall no longer be considered land 30 used in agricultural production pursuant to this subdivision. 31 § 2. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 32 law and shall apply to assessment rolls prepared on the basis of a taxa- 33 ble status date occurring on or after such date. Effective immediately, 34 the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation neces- 35 sary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 36 authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective date.